Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
Rehabilitation of Certified Historic Structures

171.396.
Definitions for KRS 171.396, 171.3961, and 171.397.

As used in this section and KRS

171.3961

and

171.397

:

“Certified historic structure” means a structure that is located within the Commonwealth of Kentucky that is:

Listed individually on the National Register of Historic Places; or

Located in a historic district listed on the National Register of Historic Places and is certified by the council as contributing to the historic significance of the district;

“Certified rehabilitation” means a completed substantial rehabilitation of a certified historic structure that the council certifies meets the United States Secretary of the Interior’s Standards for Rehabilitation;

“Certified rehabilitation credit cap” means an annual amount of:

Three million dollars ($3,000,000) for applications received prior to April 30, 2010;

Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for applications received on or after April 30, 2010, but before April 30, 2022; and

One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) for applications received on or after April 30, 2022, allocated with:

Twenty-five percent (25%) of the credit cap awarded to owner-occupied residential property; and

Seventy-five percent (75%) of the credit cap awarded to property other than owner-occupied residential property, which includes the major certified rehabilitation allowed under KRS

171.3963

;

plus any amount added to the certified rehabilitation credit cap pursuant to KRS 171.397(2)(c);

“Council” means the Kentucky Heritage Council;

“Disqualifying work” means work that is performed within three (3) years of the completion of the certified rehabilitation that, if performed as part of the rehabilitation certified under KRS

171.397

, would have made the rehabilitation ineligible for certification;

“Exempt entity” means any tax exempt organization pursuant to sec. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, any political subdivision of the Commonwealth, any state or local agency, board, or commission, or any quasi-governmental entity;

“Local government” means a city, county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government;

“Owner-occupied residential property” means a building or portion thereof, condominium, or cooperative occupied by the owner as his or her principal residence;

“Qualified rehabilitation expense” means any amount that is properly chargeable to a capital account, whether or not depreciation is allowed under Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code, and is expended in connection with the certified rehabilitation of a certified historic structure. It shall include the cost of restoring landscaping and fencing that contributes to the historic significance of this structure, but shall not include the cost of acquisition of a certified historic structure, enlargement of or additions to an existing building, or the purchase of personal property;

“Substantial rehabilitation” means rehabilitation of a certified historic structure for which the qualified rehabilitation expenses, during a twenty-four (24) month period selected by the taxpayer or exempt entity, ending with or within the taxable year, exceed:

Twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for an owner-occupied residential property; or

For all other property, the greater of:

The adjusted basis of the structure; or

Twenty thousand dollars ($20,000);

“Taxpayer” means any individual, corporation, limited liability company, business development corporation, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, association, joint stock company, receivership, trust, professional service organization, or other legal entity through which business is conducted that:

Elects to claim the credit on a return and receive a refund as provided in KRS 171.397(2)(b)2.a.; or

Is the recipient of a credit which is transferred as provided in KRS 171.397(2)(b)2.b.; and

“Qualified purchased historic home” means any substantially rehabilitated certified historic structure if:

The taxpayer claiming the credit authorized under KRS

171.397

is the first purchaser of the structure after the date of completion of the substantial rehabilitation;

The structure or a portion thereof will be the principal residence of the taxpayer; and

No credit was allowed to the seller under this section.

A qualified purchased historic home shall be deemed owner-occupied residential property for purposes of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 150, effective March 18, 2005; 2006, ch. 149, § 224, effective July 12, 2006; 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 33, effective June 26, 2009; 2014, ch. 102, § 19, effective July 15, 2014; 2021 ch. 156, § 30, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/18/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts ch. 168, sec. 165, provides that this section shall apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2005.

171.3961.
Credit against individual, corporate, and limited liability tax for certified rehabilitation to a qualifying certified historic structure within jurisdiction of consolidated local government or urban-county government.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, a taxpayer completing a certified rehabilitation to a certified historic structure shall be allowed a credit against the taxes imposed by KRS

141.020

or

141.040

and

141.0401

, with the ordering of credits as provided in KRS

141.0205

, or KRS

136.505

if:

The certified historic structure is located within the jurisdiction of a consolidated local government or urban-county government;

The amount of qualified rehabilitation expenses exceeds fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000);

The certified historic structure is located within one-half (1/2) mile of a tax increment financing development area which has received at least preliminary approval under KRS

65.490

or

154.30-050

; and

Substantial rehabilitation of the certified historic structure begins prior to July 1, 2015.

The credit shall:

Equal the percentage of qualified rehabilitation expenses as provided in KRS

171.397

(1)(a);

Only apply to the first thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) of qualified rehabilitation expenses; and

Be refundable and transferable.

Any projects approved for a credit under this section shall not be subject to any caps established by KRS

171.397

and shall not be considered in determining whether the certified rehabilitation credit cap has been met in any year.

The taxpayer seeking the credit shall file the applications for preliminary determination and final determination as provided by KRS 171.397(2).

The total approved credit shall be available over a four (4) year period and the maximum credit which may be claimed in a taxable year shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the total approved credit.

The provisions of KRS 171.397(9) to (14) shall also apply to this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 102, § 20, effective July 15, 2014.

171.3963.
Tax credit for major certified rehabilitation of historic structure.

Prior to December 31, 2021, the council may award one (1) application for preliminary approval of a major certified rehabilitation for a certified historic structure, for a tax credit against the taxes imposed by KRS

141.020

or

141.040

and

141.040

1, with the ordering of credits as provided in KRS

141.020

5.

The major certified rehabilitation shall contain the following characteristics:

The certified historic structure was individually listed on the National Register of Historic Places on or before December 31, 1981;

The size of the certified historic structure exceeds three hundred thousand (300,000) square feet;

The total project costs exceed fifty million dollars ($50,000,000);

Substantial rehabilitation of the certified historic structure begins prior to December 31, 2021; and

The application for preliminary approval reflects that following the substantial rehabilitation, the certified historic structure will be used as a hotel, tourism destination, or other use supporting or relating to the promotion of tourism to and within the Commonwealth.

The credit shall:

Equal the percentage of qualified rehabilitation expenses as provided in KRS

171.397

(1)(a);

Only apply to the first thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) of qualified rehabilitation expenses; and

Be refundable and transferable.

The project approved for a credit under this section:

Shall not be subject to the maximum credits which may be claimed with regard to owner-occupied residential property or other property that is not owner-occupied residential property established by KRS

171.397

; but

Shall be considered in determining whether the certified rehabilitation credit cap in KRS

171.396

has been met.

Any taxpayer seeking the credit shall file the application for preliminary determination and final determination as provided by KRS 171.397(2), without regard to the April 20 and June 30 dates referenced in that section.

The total approved credit shall be available over a four (4) year period and the maximum credit which may be claimed in a taxable year shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the total approved credit.

The provisions of KRS 171.397(9) to (14) shall also apply to this section.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 156, § 29, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 203, § 12, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). This statute was created in 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 156, sec. 29, but its language was later directed to be replaced by nearly identical language in 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 203, sec. 12.

171.397.
Rehabilitation of certified historic structures — Qualified rehabilitation expenses — Tax credit — Penalty — Administrative regulations.

For all applications for a preliminary approval received prior to April 30, 2010, there shall be allowed as a credit against the taxes imposed by KRS

141.020

,

141.040

,

141.040

1, or

136.505

, an amount equal to:

Thirty percent (30%) of the qualified rehabilitation expenses, in the case of owner-occupied residential property; and

Twenty percent (20%) of the qualified rehabilitation expenses, in the case of all other property.

In the case of an exempt entity that has incurred qualified rehabilitation expenses, the credit provided in this subsection shall be available to transfer or assign as provided under subsection (8) or (9) of this section.

For applications for preliminary approval received on or after April 30, 2010, the credit shall be refundable if the taxpayer makes an election under subsection (2)(b) of this section.

A taxpayer seeking the credit provided under subsection (1) of this section shall file an application for a preliminary determination of maximum credit eligibility before April 30 of the year in which the proposed project will begin. The application shall describe the project and shall include documentation supporting the qualification of the project for the credit, the proposed start date, the proposed completion date, the projected qualified rehabilitation expenses, and any other information the council may require. The council shall determine the preliminary maximum credit available for each taxpayer and shall notify the taxpayer of that amount by June 30 of the year in which the application was filed. If total credits applied for in any year exceed the certified rehabilitation credit cap, plus any amounts added to the cap pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection, the provisions of subsection (5) of this section shall be applied to reduce the approved credits for all taxpayers with qualifying applications for that year.

An application for a final determination of credit shall be submitted to the council upon completion of the project.

The application shall include an irrevocable election by the taxpayer to:

Use the credit, in which case, the credit shall be refundable; or

Transfer the credit.

The council shall determine the final amount of credit approved for each taxpayer based upon the actual expenditures, preliminary determination of maximum credit, and a determination that the expenditures are qualified rehabilitation expenses.

The council shall notify the taxpayer and Department of Revenue of the final approved credit amount within sixty (60) days of the receipt of a completed application from the taxpayer.

If the total amount of credits finally approved for a taxpayer under paragraph (b) of this subsection are less than the credits initially approved for a taxpayer under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the difference between the two (2) amounts shall be added to the certified rehabilitation credit cap for the next calendar year.

If the total amount of credits approved under paragraph (a) of this subsection in any calendar year is less than the certified rehabilitation credit cap, the difference between the credits actually awarded and the certified rehabilitation credit cap shall be added to the certified rehabilitation credit cap for the next calendar year.

The maximum credit which may be claimed with regard to owner-occupied residential property shall be one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000) subject to subsection (5) of this section. The credit in this section shall be claimed for the taxable year in which the certified rehabilitation is completed.

The maximum credit which may be claimed with regard to all other property that is not owner-occupied residential shall be ten million dollars ($10,000,000) subject to subsection (5) of this section. The credit in this section shall be claimed for the taxable year in which the certified rehabilitation is completed.

In the case of a husband and wife filing separate returns or filing separately on a joint return, the credit may be taken by either or divided equally, but the combined credit shall not exceed one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000) if subject to the limitation in subsection (3)(a) of this section, or ten million dollars ($10,000,000) if subject to the limitation in subsection (3)(b) of this section, subject to the provisions of subsection (5) of this section.

The credit amount approved for a calendar year for all taxpayers under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall be limited to the certified rehabilitation credit cap. When the total credits applied for and approved in any year under subsection (2)(a) of this section exceed the certified rehabilitation credit cap, the council shall apportion the certified rehabilitation credit cap as follows: The certified rehabilitation credit cap for the year under consideration shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator which is the approved credit amount for an individual taxpayer for a calendar year and the denominator which is the total approved credits for all taxpayers for a calendar year.

For all applications received prior to April 30, 2010, if the credit amount that may be claimed in any tax year as determined under subsections (3) to (5) of this section exceeds the taxpayer’s total tax liabilities under KRS

136.505

,

141.020

, or

141.040

and

141.040

1, the taxpayer may carry the excess tax credit forward until the tax credit is used, provided that any tax credits not used within seven (7) years of the taxable year the certified rehabilitation was complete shall be lost.

For all applications received on or after April 30, 2010, if the credit amount that may be claimed in any tax year as determined under subsections (3) to (5) of this section exceeds the taxpayer’s total tax liabilities under KRS

136.505

,

141.020

, or 141.040 and

141.0401

, the taxpayer may receive a refund, if the taxpayer elected to take the credit as required by subsection (2)(b) of this section.

The credit shall apply against both the tax imposed by KRS

141.020

or

141.040

and the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS

141.040

1, with the ordering of credits as provided in KRS

141.020

5.

For applications received prior to April 30, 2010, if the taxpayer is a pass-through entity not subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.040, the taxpayer shall apply the credit at the entity level against the limited liability tax entity imposed by KRS

141.0401

, and shall also pass the credit through in the same proportion as the distributive share of income or loss is passed through.

For applications received on or after April 30, 2010, if the taxpayer is a pass-through entity not subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.040, the taxpayer shall apply the credit at the entity level against the limited liability tax entity imposed by KRS

141.0401

, and may receive a refund if the taxpayer elected to take the credit as required by subsection (2)(b)2.a. of this section.

Credits received under this section may be transferred or assigned if an election is made under subsection (2)(b) of this section, for some or no consideration, along with any related benefits, rights, responsibilities, and liabilities to a financial institution as defined in KRS

141.010

subject to the taxes imposed by KRS

136.505

,

141.040

, or

141.040

1. Within thirty (30) days of the date of any transfer of credits, the party transferring the credits shall notify the Department of Revenue of:

The name, address, employer identification number, and bank routing and transfer number, of the party to which the credits are transferred;

The amount of credits transferred; and

Any additional information the Department of Revenue deems necessary. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to any credits that pass through to a successor or beneficiary of a taxpayer.

For purposes of this section, a lessee of a certified historic structure shall be treated as the owner of the structure if the remaining term of the lease is not less than the minimum period promulgated by administrative regulation by the council.

The taxes imposed in KRS

141.020

,

141.040

, and

141.040

1 shall not apply to any consideration received for the transfer, sale, assignment, or use of a tax credit approved under this section.

The Department of Revenue shall assess a penalty on any taxpayer or exempt entity that performs disqualifying work, as determined by the Kentucky Heritage Council, on a certified historic structure for which a rehabilitation has been certified under this section in an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the tax credit allowed on the rehabilitation. Any penalties shall be assessed against the property owner who performs the disqualifying work and not against any transferee of the credits.

The council may impose fees for processing applications for tax credits, not to exceed the actual cost associated with processing the applications.

The council may authorize a local government to perform an initial review of applications for the credit allowed under this section and forward the applications to the council with its recommendations.

The council and the Department of Revenue may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A to establish policies and procedures to implement the provisions of subsections (1) to (13) of this section.

The tax credit authorized by this section shall apply to tax periods ending on or after December 31, 2005.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 151, effective March 18, 2005; 2006, ch. 196, § 1, effective January 1, 2007; 2006 (1st Extra Sess.), ch. 2, § 68, effective June 28, 2006; 2009 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 34, effective June 26, 2009; 2022 ch. 212, § 49, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2006). 2006 Ky. Acts chs. 196, §
2, provides that the amendments to KRS

171.397

in 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 196, sec. 1, apply to taxable periods beginning on or after January 1, 2007.

(6/28/2006). 2006 (1st Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. 2, §
73, provides that “unless a provision of this Act specifically applies to an earlier tax year, the provisions of this Act shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2007.”

(3/18/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts ch. 168, §
165, provides that this section shall apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2005. Legislative

(3/18/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11, 85, 95, 97, 98, 99, 123, and 181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.